Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.110

Commission—Removal.

After public hearing, any appointee member of a commission may be removed by the chair of the board, with the approval of the board, for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4109; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.110. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 11.]